New Jersey, session 222, S443.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 100 of P.L.1972, c.154 (C.40:41A-100) is amended to read as follows: 100.  a.       The board shall promptly after its organization determine and adopt, by resolution, a set of bylaws prescribing its own rules of procedure.  [Said] The bylaws shall not be inconsistent with any lawful ordinance or statute[;] . b.    A majority of the whole number of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum[;] . c.     A resolution shall mean any act or regulation of the board required to be reduced to writing, but which may be finally passed at the meeting at which it is introduced.  The vote upon every resolution shall be taken by roll call and the yeas and nays shall be entered on the minutes[;] . d.    The [compensation] annual salary of the county executive, supervisor, manager or board president, and of [freeholders] county commissioners and the administrative officer and department heads shall be fixed by the board by ordinance [promptly after its organization]. Adoption of an ordinance shall not be required for compensation that is excluded from an officers or employees pensionable salary. (cf: P.L.1975, c.84, s.39) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.